Utah statutes.
41-6a-1111.   Bicycle racing -- When approved -- Prohibitions -- Exceptions
-- Authorized exemptions from traffic laws.
(1)  Bicycle racing on highways is prohibited under Section 41-6a-606, except
as authorized in this section.
(2) (a)  Bicycle racing on a highway is permitted when a racing event is
approved by a highway authority on a highway under its jurisdiction.
(b)  Approval of bicycle highway racing events may be granted only under
conditions:
(i)  which assure reasonable safety for all race participants, spectators, and
other highway users; and
(ii)  which prevent unreasonable interference with traffic flow which would
seriously inconvenience other highway users.
(3) Participants in an approved bicycle highway racing event may be exempted
from compliance with any traffic laws otherwise applicable:
(a)  by agreement with the approving highway authority; and
(b)  if traffic control is adequate to assure the safety of all highway users.
